Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2271.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.13, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Examination subjects and locations; provisions for color blindness, disabled veterans. (a) new text begin Except as otherwise provided in this section, each applicant for a driver's license must pass the examination required by this section before being issued a driver's license. new text end Except as otherwise provided deleted text begin in this sectiondeleted text end new text begin by sections 171.70 to 171.82new text end , the commissioner must deleted text begin examine each applicant for a driver's license by such agency as the commissioner directsdeleted text end new text begin conduct the examinationnew text end . This examination must include: (1) a test of the applicant's eyesight, provided that this requirement is met by submission of a vision examination certificate under section 171.06, subdivision 7; (2) a test of the applicant's ability to read and understand highway signs regulating, warning, and directing traffic; (3) a test of the applicant's knowledge of (i) traffic laws; (ii) the effects of alcohol and drugs on a driver's ability to operate a motor vehicle safely and legally, and of the legal penalties and financial consequences resulting from violations of laws prohibiting the operation of a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol or drugs; (iii) railroad grade crossing safety; (iv) slow-moving vehicle safety; (v) laws relating to pupil transportation safety, including the significance of school bus lights, signals, stop arm, and passing a school bus; (vi) traffic laws related to bicycles; and (vii) the circumstances and dangers of carbon monoxide poisoning; (4) an actual demonstration of ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable control in the operation of a motor vehicle; and (5) other physical and mental examinations as the commissioner finds necessary to determine the applicant's fitness to operate a motor vehicle safely upon the highways. (b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), the commissioner must not deny an application for a driver's license based on the exclusive grounds that the applicant's eyesight is deficient in color perception or that the applicant has been diagnosed with diabetes mellitus. War veterans operating motor vehicles especially equipped for disabled persons, if otherwise entitled to a license, must be granted such license. (c) The commissioner must ensure that an applicant may take an exam either in the county where the applicant resides or in an adjacent county at a reasonably convenient location. The schedule for each exam station must be posted on the department's website. (d) The commissioner deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end ensure that an applicant is able to obtain an appointment for an examination to demonstrate ability under paragraph (a), clause (4), within 14 days of the applicant's request if, under the applicable statutes and rules of the commissioner, the applicant is eligible to take the examination. (e) The commissioner must provide real-time information on the department's website about the availability and location of exam appointmentsdeleted text begin . The website must showdeleted text end new text begin offered by the department and includenew text end the next available exam dates and times for each exam station. The website must also provide an option for a person to enter an address to see the date and time of the next available exam at each exam station sorted by distance from the address provided. Sec. 2. new text begin [171.70] DEFINITIONS. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of sections 171.70 to 171.82, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Applicant" means a driver's license agent or full-service provider as defined under section 168.002, subdivision 12a, applying for approval to be a deputy testing program. new text end new text begin (c) "Letter of approval" means the document issued by the commissioner to the deputy testing program authorizing the program to administer road tests for class D drivers' licenses. new text end new text begin (d) "Road test" means the actual physical demonstration of the ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable control in the operation of a motor vehicle as required by section 171.13, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (4). new text end new text begin (e) "Deputy tester" means an individual who is an employee of a deputy testing program who has qualified for a deputy tester certificate issued by the commissioner, granting the individual authorization to conduct road tests for class D drivers' licenses. new text end new text begin (f) "Deputy tester certificate" means a certificate issued by the commissioner to the deputy tester authorizing the deputy tester to administer road tests for class D drivers' licenses on behalf of a specified deputy testing program. new text end new text begin (g) "Deputy testing program" means a driver's license agent or full-service provider authorized by the commissioner to administer the road test for a class D driver's license to an individual. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [171.71] DEPUTY TESTER; AUTHORIZATION. new text end new text begin The commissioner must allow a deputy tester that complies with the requirements of sections 171.70 to 171.82 to conduct road tests for individuals applying for class D drivers' licenses. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [171.72] PROGRAM APPLICATION; APPROVAL. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Application. new text end new text begin An applicant seeking authorization to administer road tests for class D drivers' licenses must apply to the commissioner for approval. The applicant must submit the application to the commissioner and provide the information required in subdivision 2. A deputy testing program or deputy tester employed by the program must not conduct road tests until the program is approved by the commissioner. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Application contents. new text end new text begin To apply for approval as a deputy testing program, an applicant must complete an application containing the following information: new text end new text begin (1) applicant name and contact information; new text end new text begin (2) name of the authorized person responsible for the program and application and the person's title and telephone number; new text end new text begin (3) a map, drawing, or written description of the test route to be used for road tests; new text end new text begin (4) the name, birth date, home address, and driver's license number of all individuals the applicant intends to employ as a certified deputy tester; new text end new text begin (5) an attestation that the applicant carries the required insurance, as described in chapter 65B, for all vehicles used for testing; and new text end new text begin (6) an attestation by the authorized person that the information is true and accurate. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Employment of certified tester. new text end new text begin The applicant must employ one or more certified deputy testers who meet the qualifications in section 171.75. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Evaluation. new text end new text begin The commissioner must evaluate the application submitted by the deputy testing program applicant. If the application is satisfactory, the commissioner must approve the application. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Limitation. new text end new text begin The commissioner is prohibited from imposing any criteria or requirements that are not specified by this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Commissioner's letter of approval. new text end new text begin Upon approval of an application submitted under this section, the commissioner must issue a letter of approval to designate a deputy testing program. The letter of approval constitutes an agreement between the state and the deputy testing program administering road tests for class D drivers' licenses. A letter of approval issued under this section is not transferable. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin [171.73] INDEMNIFICATION. new text end new text begin An applicant under section 171.72 must agree to indemnify and hold harmless the state and all state officers, employees, and agents of the state from and against all claims, losses, damages, costs, and other proceedings made, sustained, brought, or prosecuted in any manner based on or occasioned by or attributive to any injury, infringement, or damage rising from any act or omission of the deputy testing program or the program's employees in the performance of testing duties. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin [171.74] USE OF CERTIFIED DEPUTY TESTERS. new text end new text begin The deputy testing program must allow only individuals who have been certified by the commissioner as deputy testers under sections 171.75 and 171.76 to administer road tests. The program must maintain on file in the program's administrative office a copy of the valid certificate of each deputy tester employed by the program. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin [171.75] DEPUTY TESTER QUALIFICATIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Generally. new text end new text begin An individual seeking certification as a deputy tester must apply to the commissioner for approval. An individual seeking certification must submit an application to the commissioner and meet the requirements specified in subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Requirements. new text end new text begin To be certified as a deputy tester, the individual must: new text end new text begin (1) possess a valid driver's license; new text end new text begin (2) be 21 years of age or older; new text end new text begin (3) be a licensed driver in a state of the United States for the past three years; new text end new text begin (4) before the date of application, have maintained continuous valid driving privileges for the past year; new text end new text begin (5) successfully pass a prequalifying tester examination; new text end new text begin (6) be an employee of a deputy testing program; new text end new text begin (7) successfully complete the test administration training required of state-employed examiners; and new text end new text begin (8) have the class of driver's license and endorsements to operate the types of vehicles for which the road tests are administered. new text end new text begin The examination and training required by clauses (5) and (7) must be identical for state-employed examiners and deputy testers. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Employment; state employee prohibition. new text end new text begin A certified deputy tester must have a certificate for each deputy testing program that employs the tester. The tester must reapply and be approved for a new certificate to conduct tests on behalf of a new deputy testing program. The tester may be simultaneously employed by more than one program. A certified deputy tester must not be an employee of the department. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Maintaining certification. new text end new text begin To maintain certification as a deputy tester, an individual must: new text end new text begin (1) conduct at least 12 road tests annually from the date of initial issuance of a deputy tester certificate; new text end new text begin (2) be evaluated at least annually on the administration of tests and record keeping; new text end new text begin (3) attend annual in-service training, workshops, or seminars provided by the commissioner, provided that the requirements are the same as testers employed by the department; new text end new text begin (4) submit monthly testing reports in a format specified by the commissioner; and new text end new text begin (5) account for all records of examinations issued by the commissioner to a deputy tester and submit the record of examination immediately to the commissioner after completing a road test. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Limitation. new text end new text begin The commissioner is prohibited from imposing any criteria or requirements on deputy testing programs or deputy testers that are not specified by this section. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin [171.76] CERTIFICATES AND LETTER OF APPROVAL. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Tester certificates. new text end new text begin Upon approval of an application submitted under section 171.75, the commissioner must issue a certificate to each approved deputy tester of a deputy testing program. The deputy testing program must keep a copy of the certificate of each deputy tester employed by the program on file in the office of the program. A deputy tester's certificate is effective on the date of issuance by the commissioner and expires four years after issuance. A deputy tester may not conduct road tests without a valid deputy tester certificate. A certificate issued to a deputy tester is not transferable. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Certificate renewal time frame. new text end new text begin A deputy tester must submit an application for renewal of the tester's certificate to the commissioner no less than 30 days before the previously issued certificate expires. new text end Sec. 9. new text begin [171.77] TEST PROOF. new text end new text begin The deputy testing program must provide a record of examination, on a form obtained from or approved by the commissioner, to an individual who has passed a road test for a class D driver's license. The record of examination, which must be presented at the time of application for a class D driver's license, must specify that the individual has passed the required test or tests administered by the deputy testing program. new text end Sec. 10. new text begin [171.78] AUDITS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Random examinations; inspections; audits. new text end new text begin A deputy testing program approved by the commissioner must allow representatives of the commissioner, on behalf of the state, to conduct random examinations, inspections, and audits of the testing operation without prior notice. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin On-site inspections. new text end new text begin A deputy testing program must permit on-site inspections by agents of the commissioner as necessary to determine compliance with sections 171.70 to 171.82. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Examination of test administration. new text end new text begin On at least an annual basis, agents of the commissioner who are state employees must be permitted to: new text end new text begin (1) take the tests actually administered by the deputy testing program as if the state employees were test applicants; new text end new text begin (2) test a sample of drivers who were examined by the deputy testing program to compare passing and failing results; or new text end new text begin (3) conduct a road test simultaneously with the deputy tester to compare test results. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Notice of test schedule. new text end new text begin Upon request, and no less than 48 hours in advance, the deputy testing program must provide the commissioner with the scheduled times and dates that skill tests and road tests are to be given. new text end Sec. 11. new text begin [171.79] TEST ADMINISTRATION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Generally. new text end new text begin Road tests conducted by a deputy tester must meet the requirements in Minnesota Rules, parts 7410.4800 to 7410.5380. The commissioner is prohibited from imposing additional test administration criteria or requirements on deputy testers. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Deputy tester restrictions. new text end new text begin A deputy tester must not: new text end new text begin (1) delegate any portion of testing to another individual; new text end new text begin (2) be the spouse, fiancé, grandparent, parent, child, sibling, or legal guardian, including adoptive, half-, step-, and in-law relationships, of the person taking the test; new text end new text begin (3) test anyone with a physical disability who may need an individualized restriction added to the person's driver's license; or new text end new text begin (4) test anyone who has not completed all required coursework and training before administering a road test. new text end Sec. 12. new text begin [171.80] RECORD KEEPING; REPORTING REQUIREMENTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Records of administered tests. new text end new text begin An approved deputy testing program must maintain, at the program's administrative office for a minimum of three years, the tester's copy of the record of examination of any driver for whom the deputy testing program conducts a test, whether or not the driver passes or fails the test. Each record of examination must include the: new text end new text begin (1) full name of the driver; new text end new text begin (2) date the driver took the test; and new text end new text begin (3) name and certificate number of the deputy tester conducting the test. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Records of deputy testers. new text end new text begin The deputy testing program must maintain, at the program's administrative office, a record of each deputy tester in the employ of the deputy testing program at that location. Each record must include: new text end new text begin (1) a valid and complete tester certificate indicating the deputy tester has met all qualifications; new text end new text begin (2) a copy of the deputy tester's current driving record, which must be updated annually; and new text end new text begin (3) evidence that the deputy tester is an employee of the deputy testing program. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Record retention. new text end new text begin The deputy testing program must retain all deputy tester records for three years after a deputy tester leaves the employ of the deputy testing program. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Reporting requirements. new text end new text begin The deputy testing program must report the number of road tests administered annually by all deputy testers employed by the program. The report must be in writing or in an electronic format approved by the commissioner and must be received by the commissioner within 45 days of the end of each calendar year. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Data Practices Act. new text end new text begin All deputy testing programs and deputy testers are subject to section 13.05, subdivision 11. new text end Sec. 13. new text begin [171.81] NOTIFICATION REQUIREMENTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Generally. new text end new text begin The deputy testing program must ensure that the commissioner is notified in writing or electronically: new text end new text begin (1) ten days before a deputy tester leaves the employ of the deputy testing program; new text end new text begin (2) within ten days of a change in a deputy tester's driving status; new text end new text begin (3) within ten days of the deputy testing program ceasing operations in Minnesota; or new text end new text begin (4) within ten days of a deputy tester: new text end new text begin (i) receiving notice from any state that the tester's driving privileges have been withdrawn; or new text end new text begin (ii) failing to comply with the deputy testing program or deputy tester requirements in sections 171.70 to 171.82. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Test route change. new text end new text begin Before changing a test route, a deputy testing program must submit a written request and obtain written approval from the commissioner for any proposed change in the road test route. The request may be submitted by facsimile or email. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Tester change. new text end new text begin A deputy tester must notify the commissioner within ten days of leaving the employ of a deputy testing program. new text end Sec. 14. new text begin [171.82] DENIAL, CANCELLATION, OR SUSPENSION OF PROGRAM OR TESTER; APPEAL. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Denial. new text end new text begin The commissioner may deny an application for a deputy testing program or tester certificate if the applicant does not qualify for approval or certification under sections 171.70 to 171.81. A misstatement or misrepresentation on the application is grounds for denying a letter of approval or tester certificate. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Cancellation or suspension. new text end new text begin The commissioner may cancel the approval of a deputy testing program or deputy tester or may suspend a program or tester for: new text end new text begin (1) failure to comply with or satisfy any provision of sections 171.70 to 171.81; new text end new text begin (2) falsification of any records or information relating to the deputy testing program; new text end new text begin (3) performance in a manner that compromises the integrity of the deputy testing program. The commissioner must use the same standards of integrity for state-employed testers and deputy testers; or new text end new text begin (4) the withdrawal of a deputy tester's driving privileges. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Commissioner's discretion. new text end new text begin (a) The existence of grounds for cancellation or suspension under subdivision 2 is determined at the sole discretion of the commissioner. If the commissioner determines that grounds for cancellation or suspension exist for failure to comply with or satisfy any requirement in sections 171.70 to 171.81, the commissioner may immediately cancel or suspend the deputy testing program or deputy tester from administering any further tests. new text end new text begin (b) When an application to be a deputy testing program or deputy tester is denied, or when an individual program approval or a tester's certificate is canceled, notice must be mailed to the subject indicating the reasons for the denial or cancellation and that the deputy testing program or deputy tester may appeal the decision as provided in subdivision 5. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Correction order. new text end new text begin If an audit by the commissioner identifies a situation that needs correction but does not merit suspension or cancellation, the commissioner may issue a correction order to a deputy tester or program within 30 days to correct a deficiency before the program or tester becomes subject to suspension or cancellation. The notice must include the basis for requiring the correction. The notice must notify the individual of the ability to appeal the correction order as provided in subdivision 5. The deputy testing program or deputy tester is allowed 30 days to correct the deficiency without having to reapply. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Notice of denial or cancellation; request for reconsideration and hearing. new text end new text begin (a) Within 20 calendar days of receiving a notice of cancellation or denial issued pursuant to subdivision 3 or a correction order issued pursuant to subdivision 4, the deputy testing program or deputy tester may submit a request for reconsideration in writing to the commissioner. The commissioner must review the request for reconsideration and issue a decision within 30 days of receipt of the request. Upon receipt of the commissioner's decision, the affected party may initiate a contested case proceeding under chapter 14. new text end new text begin (b) As an alternative to the process in paragraph (a), the affected party may initiate a contested case proceeding within 20 calendar days of receiving a notice of cancellation or denial issued pursuant to subdivision 3 or a correction order issued pursuant to subdivision 4. new text end new text begin (c) If a correction order issued pursuant to subdivision 4 is contested as provided in paragraph (a) or (b), the commissioner must not enforce the correction order until a final decision has been made following the contested case proceeding. new text end Sec. 15. new text begin IMPLEMENTATION.new text end new text begin The commissioner of public safety must implement the requirements of this act with existing resources. The commissioner must not hire additional staff to implement the requirements of this act or to conduct audits as required by Minnesota Statutes, section 171.78. new text end Sec. 16. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin This act is effective August 1, 2025. new text end